Idaho, session 2025, H0077.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-1867, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-1867. LIMITED LICENSE FOR BRIDGE YEAR ASSISTANT PHYSICIANS. (1) As
used in this section and section 54-1868, Idaho Code:
(a) "Assistant physician" means a person who:
(i) Is within the first three (3) years of graduation from a med-
ical school accredited or provisionally accredited by an entity
recognized by the board; and
(ii) Is a United States citizen or attended medical school in the
United States.
(a) (b) "Board" means the state board of medicine.
(b) "Bridge year physician" means a person who:
(i) Is within the first year of graduation from a medical school
accredited or provisionally accredited by an entity recognized by
the board;
(ii) Is a United States citizen or attended medical school in the
United States; and
(iii) Applied to, but was not accepted into, an accredited medical
residency training program.
(2) The board shall establish a one (1) three (3) year, nonrenewable
renewable limited license under which bridge year assistant physicians may
practice medicine under terms, conditions, and a scope of practice deter-
mined by the board. If there is a limit to the number of limited licenses that
may be issued, priority shall be granted to bridge year assistant physicians
who live in Idaho or who have longstanding long-standing ties to the state of
Idaho, as determined by the board.
(3) Persons practicing under a limited license established pursuant to
this section shall:
(a) Practice only within the scope of practice determined by the board;
(b) Practice under the supervision of a licensed physician or pursuant
to a collaborative practice agreement. The person practicing under a
limited license shall qualify as one (1) of a supervising physician's
permitted advanced practice professionals. The board shall prescribe
supervision requirements for limited licensees, provided that such re-


quirements shall be no less stringent than supervision requirements for
physician assistants;
(c) Have prescriptive authority as determined by the board; and
(d) Be subject to the same professional discipline, civil liability,
and criminal liability as a fully licensed physician.
(4) The services provided by a person practicing under a limited li-
cense shall be compensable in accordance with customary medical billing
practices.
(5) The board is authorized to:
(a) Take such actions as are necessary to implement the provisions of
this section, including the promulgation of any necessary rules;
(b) Charge a fee of up to three hundred dollars ($300) for a limited li-
cense; and
(c) Cooperate with the department of health and welfare and other rel-
evant entities, including hospitals and health care clinics, whether
public or private, in establishing a limited license.
(6) No later than January 31, 2033, the board shall provide a report to
the senate and house of representatives health and welfare committees on:
(a) Requirements for a limited license;
(b) The number of limited licenses issued and the number of limited li-
cense holders who were later accepted into a residency program; and
(c) Whether and how limited licenses have increased the supply of
health care providers in health professional shortage areas.;
(d) The number of limited license holders remaining in practice without
attaining full licensure; and
(e) The number of assistant physicians who ultimately attained full li-
censure without being accepted into a residency program.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 18, Title 54, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 54-1868, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
54-1868. GENERAL PRACTICE LICENSURE FOR ASSISTANT PHYSICIANS. (1)
An assistant physician with a license in good standing shall be eligible to
become a licensed general practitioner if the assistant physician has com-
pleted:
(a) Step 3 of the United States medical licensing examination or the
equivalent of such step of any board-approved medical licensing exami-
nation in three (3) or fewer attempts and within a seven (7) year period
after completing steps 1 and 2 of the United States medical licensing
examination;
(b) A total of thirty-six (36) months of cumulative, postgraduate,
hands-on, full-time, active collaborative practice. The thirty-six
(36) month period shall begin on the date the assistant physician en-
tered into a collaborative practice arrangement and began practicing.
Any time the assistant physician was not working within a collaborative
practice arrangement with a collaborating physician shall not count
toward this requirement; and
(c) At least fifty (50) hours of continuing medical education every
year during the period of active collaborative practice described in
this section.


(2) In order to meet the thirty-six (36) month collaborative practice
requirement of subsection (1)(b) of this section, an assistant physician
shall present a didactic training report every one hundred twenty (120) days
to the collaborating physician during the thirty-six (36) month period.
(3) Upon an assistant physician's completion of the requirements of
subsection (1) of this section, the board shall issue to the assistant physi-
cian a license to practice as a licensed general practitioner.
(4) Any assistant physician obtaining licensure as a physician under
this section shall be fully licensed as a physician and shall be subject to
all statutes and regulations pertaining to physicians.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.